apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
	    <pardef n="numeros">
	      <e>        <re>[0-9]+([., ][0-1]+)?([%°])?</re>        <p>          <l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>        <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>        <p>          <l>-ата</l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>        <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>        <p>          <l><b/>г.</l>          <r><b/>г.<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>        <re>[0-9]+</re>        <p>          <l><b/>година</l>          <r><b/>година<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
	      <e r="LR"> <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>        <p>          <l>г</l>          <r>г<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
	      <e><re>[0-9][0-9]</re><p><l>/</l><r>\/</r></p><re>[0-9][0-9]</re><p><l>/</l><r>\/</r></p><re>[0-9][0-9][0-9][0-9]</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
	      <e r="LR"> <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>        <p>          <l>км</l>          <r>км<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
	      <e r="LR"> <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>        <p>          <l>см</l>          <r>см<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>        <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>        <p>          <l>мм</l>          <r>мм<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
	      <e r="LR"> <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>        <p>          <l><b/>мм</l>          <r>мм<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
	      <e r="LR"> <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>        <p>          <l>гр</l>          <r>гр<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
	      <e r="LR"> <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>        <p>          <l><b/>млн</l>          <r>млн<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>        <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>        <p>          <l>млн</l>          <r>млн<s n="num"/></r></p></e>


		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-ми</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-ма</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-мо</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-ми</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-мият</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-мия</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-мата</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-мото</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-мите</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>


		<e><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>-те</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>


		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-та</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-то</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тият</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тия</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тата</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тото</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тите</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>


		<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-та</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-то</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тият</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тия</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тата</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тото</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тите</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>


		<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-та</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-то</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-тият</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-тия</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-тата</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-тото</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-тите</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>


		<e><re>[0-9]*17</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*17</re><p><l>-та</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*17</re><p><l>-то</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*17</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*17</re><p><l>-тият</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*17</re><p><l>-тия</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*17</re><p><l>-тата</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*17</re><p><l>-тото</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*17</re><p><l>-тите</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>


		<e><re>[0-9]*18</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*18</re><p><l>-та</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*18</re><p><l>-то</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><re>[0-9]*18</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
